Massachusetts, session 194th, H683.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 70 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10 the following new section:-
Section 10A: FY 2007-2009 Inflation-Adjusted Additional Aid
Section 10A. Chapter 70 school aid, as defined in section 2 of said chapter 70,
notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, shall be adjusted to reflect the
actual costs of inflation and shall be distributed, at a minimum, in amounts that reflect such
inflation for each year as so warranted by this section. Chapter 70 school aid for fiscal years
2007 through 2009, inclusive, shall be recalculated by the department to reflect such aid adjusted
for the actual costs of inflation for each such year and the additional amounts, if any, in excess of
the amounts actually distributed for each such year shall be distributed in a third column in
section 3 in the general appropriation act, entitled, "FY 2007-2009 Inflation-Adjusted Additional
Aid", for fiscal years 2024 through 2026, respectively.
of 1